src/fst/morphology/stems/particles.lexc
!! # Tokelau particles


LEXICON pcle   !!≈ * CODE@
+Pcle: # ;   !!≈ * CODE@

LEXICON pclemph   !!≈ * CODE@
+Pcle+Emph: # ;   !!≈ * CODE@


LEXICON Particles   !!≈ * CODE@
ake pcle ;   !!≈ * CODE@ Post-verbal directional
atu pcle ;   !!≈ * CODE@ Post-verbal directional
ei pcle ;   !!≈ * CODE@ anaphoric particle, after Pr, referring to antecedent
ia pcle ;   !!≈ * CODE@ In front of Prop, Pron, locnoun
ia pclemph ;   !!≈ * CODE@Post-nominal emphatic
ifo pcle ;   !!≈ * CODE@Post-verbal directional
oioti pcle "just, only" ;   !!≈ * CODE@preverbal qualifying particle (oioti oi kaumai te tuhi)
foki pcle "emph" ;   !!≈ * CODE@follows the word it emph
ko pcle ;   !!≈ * CODE@Pre-nominal, introducing S or NP
lō pcle "comparative particle" ;   !!≈ * CODE@in phrase "i lō"
mai pcle ;   !!≈ * CODE@Pre-verbal particle
heā pcle ;   !!≈ * CODE@interrogative particle !
ta pcle ;   !!≈ * CODE@Pre-pronominal particle, o-class
to pcle ;   !!≈ * CODE@Pre-pronominal particle, a-class
vave pcle ;   !!≈ * CODE@Pre-verbal particle
vāe pcle "divide" ;   !!≈ * CODE@in front of numerals

!! That was all particles
